test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshinaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiinyshiwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinyshiwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+4: waawaatesiinyshinwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiinyshiniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiinsshiwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinsshiwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: waawaatesiinsshinwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiinsshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinyshibniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinyshibniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyshibniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsshibniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsshibniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsshibniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinyshibniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinyshibniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshibniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsshibniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsshibniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshibniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinyshibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinyshibniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsshibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsshibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinyshibniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinyshibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinyshibniig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsshibniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsshibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinsshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinynaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinynaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinynaanbaniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsnaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsnaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinynaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinynaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinynaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinywaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinywaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinywaabniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsnaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsnaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinswaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinswaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinswaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinywaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinywaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinyniwbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinyniwbaniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiinswaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinswaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsniwbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiimshinaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshinaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiimshinaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshinaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiimshiwaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshiwaadig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiimshinwiba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiimshinaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiimshinaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshinaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiimshinaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiimshinaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshinaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiimshiwaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiimshiwaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshiwaag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiimshiwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiimshiwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: waawaatesiimshinwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiimshiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiimshibniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiimshibniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshibniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiimshibniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiimshibniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshibniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiimshibniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimshibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiimshibniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimshibniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiimshibniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiimnaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiimnaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiimnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiimnaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiimnaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiimnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiimwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiimwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiimwaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaatesiimwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: waawaatesiimniwbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaawaateswishnaanbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaawaateswishnaanbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaawaateswishnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaateswishnaanbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaateswishnaanbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaateswishnaanbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaawaateswishwaabniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaawaateswishwaabniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaawaateswishwaabniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waawaateswishwaabniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waawaateswishwaabniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waawaateswishniwbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waawaateswishniwbaniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiinymishnaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinymishnaandig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinymishnaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinymishwaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishwaadig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaadig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiinymishniwba
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiinsmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiinymishnaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiinymishnaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiinymishnaanig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsmishnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinymishnaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinymishnaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinymishwaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinymishwaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishwaag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishwaag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiinymishwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinymishwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: waawaatesiinymishniwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiinymishniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiinsmishwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinsmishwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: waawaatesiinsmishniwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiinsmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinymishbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinymishbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinymishbaniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsmishbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsmishbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsmishbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinymishbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinymishbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymishbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsmishbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsmishbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmishbaniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinymishbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinymishbaniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsmishbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsmishbaniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waawaatesiinymishbaniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinymishbaniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinymishbaniig
